District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0240.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Uniform College Athlete Name, Image, or Likeness Temporary
Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Section 215 of the Uniform College Athlete Name, Image, or Likeness Act of
2022, effective February 23, 2023 (D.C. Law 24-245; D.C. Official Code § 38-1631.05), is
amended as follows:
(a) Subsection (a) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (2) is amended by striking the phrase “; and” and inserting a
semicolon in its place.
(2) Paragraph (3) is amended by striking the phrase “; and” and inserting a
semicolon in its place.
(3) New paragraphs (4) and (5) are added to read as follows:
“(4) With selecting, arranging for, or providing payment to a name, image, or
likeness agent; and
“(5) With selecting, arranging for, or collecting payment from a third party
engaged in specific name, image, or likeness agreements with a college athlete or athletes.”.
(b) Subsection (e) is repealed.
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Sec. 3. Section 5710 of Title 3 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations (3
DCMR § 5710) is amended by adding a new subsection 5710.03 to read as follows:
“5710.3 This section shall not apply before January 1, 2026.”.
Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 5. Effective date.
(a) This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by
the Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of Congressional
review as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
(b) This act shall expire after 225 days of its having effect.
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2